Utah statutes.
20A-14-102.1.   Omissions from maps -- How resolved.

(1)  If any area of the state is omitted from a State Board of Education district in the Board block assignment file enacted by the Legislature, the county clerk of the affected county, upon discovery of the omission, shall attach the area to the appropriate State Board of Education district according to the requirements of Subsections (2) and (3).

(2)  If the omitted area is surrounded by a single State Board of Education district, the county clerk shall attach the area to that district.

(3)  If the omitted area is contiguous to two or more State Board of Education districts, the county clerk shall attach the area to the district that has the least population, as determined by the official census population figures and maps described in Subsection 20A-14-101.5(2).

(4) The county clerk shall certify in writing and file with the lieutenant governor any attachment made under this section.

